West Virginia, session 2026, HB5500.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 17. SIZE, WEIGHT AND LOAD. §17C-17-6. Loads to be securely fastened and not allowed to leak, escape, etc. (a) No vehicle or combination of vehicles shall may be operated on any highway unless such vehicle or combination of vehicles is so constructed or loaded as to prevent any of its load from dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping therefrom, except that sand may be dropped for the purpose of securing traction, or water or other substance may be sprinkled on a roadway in cleaning or maintaining such roadway.(b) It shall be is unlawful to operate on any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles with any load unless said the load and any covering thereon is securely fastened so as to prevent said the covering or load from becoming loose, detached, or in any manner a hazard to other users of the highway.(c) The Legislature finds that there are certain times of the year farmers gather hay, straw, silage, and other vegetative, bio-degradable products that are transported, generally on open top farm trucks, trailers, and other vehicles, to other farms needing these products.  And, while these products pose no more danger than fall foliage and have zero impact on the environment, there are times when these loads of the farm product escape and are subject to littering or failing to maintain load violations. Therefore, the penalty provisions of this article for violations of this section do not apply:  Provided, That this exemption does not apply to farm trucks, trailers, and other vehicles that are full of bales of vegetative products, or portions of bales large enough to cause injury if the load escapes from the vehicle. The commissioner of the department of highways may establish (1) speed limits for these vehicles that do not exceed 45 miles per hour when hauling bio-degradable farm/field products which are inclined to blow away; and (2) require a special permit for the farm trucks, trailers, and other vehicles hauling and transporting bio-degradable farm/field products